Hawaii statutes.
[§397-11] Trade secrets. Information
obtained by the department containing or revealing a trade secret shall be held
confidential and access shall be limited to authorized representatives of the
director concerned with carrying out this chapter or when relevant in any
proceeding under this chapter. In such proceeding the director, the appeals
board, or the court shall issue such orders as may be appropriate to protect
the confidentiality of trade secrets. [L 1980, c 19, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next